Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-924
Police officers and sheriffs; appointment to serve; when.

The election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk may appoint or summon such police officers and sheriffs as may be necessary to maintain order at the election and enforce the Election Act. Except in counties having an election commissioner, if no police officer or sheriff is available, the judges of election may appoint one or more persons in writing to act as and have the powers of a police officer.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 267.